District of Columbia statutes.
29-913

Voting — Number permitted by each member.

(a)

Each member of an association shall have only one vote, except as may be altered in the articles or bylaws for:

(1)

Voting by member organizations; or

(2)

Allocation of votes in a cooperative housing association proportionate to the share of ownership in the association or on the basis of one vote for each unit.

(b)

A voting agreement or other device to evade the requirements of this section shall not be enforceable.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-813.
1981 Ed., § 29-1113.
2001 Ed., § 29-913.
This section is referenced in § 29-902 and § 29-925.